Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.030

Jurisdiction—Maximum penalties for criminal violations—Review—Costs.

The municipal court shall have jurisdiction to try violations of all city ordinances and all other actions brought to enforce or recover license penalties or forfeitures declared or given by any such ordinances. It is empowered to forfeit cash bail or bail bonds and issue execution thereon, to hear and determine all causes, civil or criminal, arising under such ordinances, and to pronounce judgment in accordance therewith: PROVIDED, That for a violation of the criminal provisions of an ordinance no greater punishment shall be imposed than a fine of five thousand dollars or imprisonment in the city jail for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both such fine and imprisonment, but the punishment for any criminal ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in state law for the same crime. All civil and criminal proceedings in municipal court, and judgments rendered therein, shall be subject to review in the superior court by writ of review or on appeal: PROVIDED, That an appeal from the court's determination or order in a traffic infraction proceeding may be taken only in accordance with RCW 46.63.090(5). Costs in civil and criminal cases may be taxed as provided in district courts. A municipal court participating in the program established by the administrative office of the courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160 shall have jurisdiction to take recognizance, approve bail, and arraign defendants held within its jurisdiction on warrants issued by any court of limited jurisdiction participating in the program.

[ 2011 c 96 s 24; 2005 c 282 s 41; 2000 c 111 s 7; 1993 c 83 s 3; 1984 c 258 s 801; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 23; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.030. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.

Effective date—1993 c 83: See note following RCW 35.21.163.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.